California, session 20252026, AB2306.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 99501 of the Government Code is amended to read:99501. (a) (1) The state point of contact, within the executive branch, acts, in compliance with federal practice, as the liaison between the state and the Office of the United States Trade Representative on trade-related matters.(2) The state point of contact who, in compliance with federal practice, receives updates from the federal government on trade policies, is often provided the opportunity to review and comment on ongoing trade negotiations.(b) The state point of contact shall, in addition to any other duties assigned by the Governor, do all of the following:(1) Promptly disseminate correspondence or information from the United States Trade Representative to the appropriate state agencies and departments departments, and legislative committees.(2) Work with the appropriate state agencies and departments, and the Legislature, to review the effects on the California environment, and California businesses, workers, and general lawmaking authority, of any proposed or enacted trade agreement provisions, and communicate those findings to the United States Trade Representative.(3) Serve as liaison to the Legislature on matters of trade policy oversight.